District of Columbia statutes.
47-3905

Returns and payment of tax.

(a)

Each toll telecommunication company shall be subject to the following filing and payment requirements:

(1)

On or before the 20th day of each calendar month, each toll telecommunication company subject to tax under this chapter shall file a return with the Mayor that reports the amount of its monthly gross charges for the preceding calendar month from the sale of toll telecommunication services that originate or terminate in the District and for which a charge is made to a service address located in the District, regardless of where the charge is billed or paid.

(2)

For each calendar month beginning March 1, 1989, each toll telecommunication company shall pay the tax imposed by this chapter before the 21st day of the succeeding calendar month. The return for each calendar month shall be filed at the time payment is made or on the 20th day of the succeeding calendar month, whichever is earlier.

(3)

The form of the return shall be prescribed by the Mayor and the return shall contain information that the Mayor considers necessary for the proper administration of the tax.

(b)

Each wireless telecommunication company shall be subject to the following filing and payment requirements:

(1)

On or before the 20th day of each calendar month, each wireless telecommunication company subject to tax under this chapter shall file a return with the Mayor that reports the amount of its monthly gross charges for the preceding calendar month from the sale of District-based wireless telecommunication service.

(2)

For each calendar month beginning May 1, 1997, each wireless telecommunication company shall pay the tax before the 21st day of the succeeding calendar month. The return for each calendar month shall be filed at the time payment is made or on the 20th day of the succeeding calendar month, whichever is earlier.

(3)

The form of the return shall be prescribed by the Mayor and the return shall contain information that the Mayor considers necessary for the proper administration of the tax.

Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-26, § 6, 36 DCR 4723
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-198, § 106, 43 DCR 4569
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 59, 44 DCR 1271
Apr. 30, 1998, D.C. Law 12-100, § 2(e), 45 DCR 1533
1981 Ed., § 47-3905.